Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1404
Public grounds, interests in; cannot arise by operation of law.

No privilege, franchise, right, title, right of user, or other interest in or to any street, avenue, road, thoroughfare, alley or public grounds in any county, city, municipality, town, or village of this state, or in the space or region under, through or above any such street, avenue, road, thoroughfare, alley, or public grounds, shall ever arise or be created, secured, acquired, extended, enlarged or amplified by user, occupation, acquiescence, implication, or estoppel.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. I, § 4, p. 509.

Title by prescription cannot be obtained to all or any part of state highway. State v. Merritt Brothers Sand & Gravel Co., 180 Neb. 660, 144 N.W.2d 180 (1966).